Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-349
Policy or contract; statement required.

No policy or contract of insurance or renewal thereof shall be made, issued, used, or delivered by any assessment insurer in this state unless it states on its face that it is issued by an assessment insurer.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 136, p. 466;

R.S.1913, § 3273;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XI, § 1, p. 647;

C.S.1922, § 7880;

C.S.1929, § 44-1101;

R.S.1943, § 44-349;

Laws 1959, c. 201, § 1, p. 711;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 3.